Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1311
Department; determine railroad crossing safety measures needed.

The department shall have authority to determine that (1) a railroad crossing shall be eliminated, (2) automatic railroad grade crossing protection devices shall be installed, modified, or improved, (3) an overpass or underpass is needed at a railroad crossing, or (4) other measures are necessary to improve public safety at railroad crossings.

Laws 1979, LB 42, § 2.